Florida, session 2026, HB339.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (4) is added to section 499.0054,
Florida Statutes, to read:
499.0054 Advertising and labeling of drugs, devices, and
cosmetics; exemptions.—
(4)(a) As used in this subsection, the term "advertise"
means a media communication, including, but not limited to,
television, radio, print, the Internet, digital or electronic
media, product placement, promotion by an influencer in exchange
for compensation, or any other manner of paid promotion, that a
vaccine manufacturer purchases to promote the manufacturer's
vaccine. The term does not include:
1. Any discussion between a health care provider and the
provider's patient or any written materials that a health care
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb339-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 339 2026
provider provides to a patient concerning a vaccine; or
2. Any posters, decorations, or other materials or
promotional items concerning a vaccine that are displayed in or
made available by a health care facility, health care provider's
office, or other clinical setting.
(b) A manufacturer is liable to an individual if the
manufacturer advertises a vaccine in this state and the
advertised vaccine causes harm or injury to an individual.
(c) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, an
individual may bring an action under this section within 3 years
following the accrual of the cause of action.
(d) A court shall award a claimant who prevails in an
action brought under this section actual damages, court costs,
and reasonable attorney fees.
Section 2. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb339-01-c1